Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2259.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 30ACTIONS NOT PERMISSIBLE IN A COURTHOUSESec.3001. Definitions.3002. Civil arrest on courthouse grounds.3003. Protected travel to court proceedings.3004. Use of facial coverings on courthouse property.3005. Protected personal information.§ 3001. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 1234567891011121314151617 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Court." A court within the unified judicial system as described in section 301 (relating to unified judicial system)."Court companion." An individual whose purpose is to support, assist or accompany an individual who is going to, remaining at or returning from a court proceeding. The term includes:(1) a spouse, domestic partner or individual who has a dating or engagement relationship with the party, witness or potential witness;(2) a biological parent, foster parent, adoptive parent or stepparent of a party, witness or potential witness;(3) a minor child or other individual under the care of a party, witness or potential witness;(4) an interpreter, translator or individual assisting the party, witness or potential witness with reading or completing court forms or other documents;(5) an individual providing health care or assistance to a party, witness or potential witness to allow that individual to participate in the court proceeding;(6) a case manager or social worker for the party, witness or potential witness;(7) a domestic violence or sexual assault advocate; and(8) an individual transporting a party, witness or potential witness to or from the court proceeding."Courthouse." The interior of any facility or property in which a court conducts business."Courthouse grounds." A courthouse and any garage or parking lot owned by a court or under contract with a court, for the 20260HB2259PN2956 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purpose of serving a courthouse, any walkway or sidewalk on the grounds of, contiguous to or abutting the grounds of the courthouse or connecting the garage or parking lot to the courthouse or grounds of the courthouse."Immigration enforcement. " An effort to investigate, enforce or assist in an investigation or enforcement of:(1) A Federal civil immigration law.(2) A Federal criminal immigration law that penalizes an individual's presence in, entry or reentry to or employment in the United States, including a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1253 (relating to penalties related to removal), 1324c (relating to penalties for document fraud), 1325 (relating to improper entry by alien) or 1326 (relating to reentry of removed aliens)."Judicial warrant." A written order that is signed by a judicial officer from a Federal court that receives its jurisdiction from Article III of the Constitution of the United States or a court and that directs a law enforcement agency or individual who is specifically named in the order to arrest an individual named in the written order to be arrested."Personal information." The following:(1) an individual's address, workplace or hours of work, school or school hours;(2) the date, time or place of an individual's hearing, proceeding or appointment with a public agency; or(3) any other information that provides the date, time or place of where an individual may be located."Public agency." The following:(1) an executive, administrative or legislative office of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions; or 20260HB2259PN2956 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) a department, institution, bureau, board, commission, authority or official of the Commonwealth. § 3002. Civil arrest on courthouse grounds. (a) Arrest without warrant.--A representative of a Federal, State or local law enforcement authority may not detain, arrest or otherwise take into custody an individual on courthouse grounds on the basis of immigration enforcement, unless the representative is acting in the representative's official capacity and the representative possesses on his or her person a judicial warrant that clearly demonstrates that the individual to be detained, arrested or otherwise taken into custody is the subject of a judicial warrant.(b) Warrant disclosure.--If a representative of a Federal, State or local law enforcement authority is performing an arrest on the basis of immigration enforcement on court house grounds, the arresting representative shall provide the necessary documentation under subsection (a) to any Commonwealth employee who requests to review the documentation.(c) Violations.-- An individual that violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of $10,000 for each violation. A penalty imposed under this section shall be paid to the Commonwealth.(d) Immunity.--No action may be commenced under subsection (c) against the judicial branch or an officer or employee of a courthouse or court office acting lawfully and in good faith pursuant to the officer's or employee's official capacity, regarding actions or omissions of said branch or such officer or employee.§ 3003. Protected travel to court proceedings.(a) Travel protection.--20260HB2259PN2956 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An individual attending a court proceeding in which the individual is a party, a witness, a potential witness or court companion of a party, witness or potential witness, shall not be subject to arrest for a civil immigration offense while going to, remaining at and returning from the court proceeding.(2) Nothing under this section shall preclude the execution of a criminal arrest warrant issued by a judge or a criminal arrest based on probable cause for a violation of criminal law, not including immigration law.(b) Violations.--An individual that arrests an individual in violation of subsection (a) is subject to a civil penalty of $10,000 for each violation. A penalty imposed under this section shall be paid to the Commonwealth.§ 3004. Use of facial coverings on courthouse property.(a) Restriction.--A representative of a Federal, State or local law enforcement authority may not, while carrying out the enforcement of laws of this Commonwealth , any other state or the United States, wear a mask or other covering that obscures the face of the individual while on courthouse grounds unless medically necessary and with prior authorization of the court. (b) Violations.--An individual that violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of $10,000 for each violation. A penalty imposed under this section shall be paid to the Commonwealth.§ 3005. Protected personal information.(a) Information restriction.--A public agency or employee, appointee, officer or official or any other individual acting on behalf of a public agency may not disclose personal information that is not a matter of public record regarding a court 20260HB2259PN2956 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appearance by an individual for a court proceeding in which the individual is a party, a witness, a potential witness or court companion to any other individual or entity that is not a public agency or employee, appointee, officer or official or any other individual acting on behalf of a public agency, unless the disclosure is:(1) authorized in writing by the individual to whom the information pertains or, if the individual is under 18 years of age or not legally competent to consent to the disclosure, by the parent or guardian of the individual;(2) necessary in furtherance of a criminal investigation of terrorism of an individual identified as a possible match in the Federal Terrorist Screening Database or similar database; or(3) otherwise required by Federal or State law, including student and exchange visitor visa sponsorship requirements for public institutions of higher education or in compliance with a judicial warrant or court order issued by a judge or magistrate of the Federal judicial branch or a court.(b) Enforcement.--(1) The Attorney General may bring an action against an individual or entity that violates this section. (2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the Attorney General to assert a claim against a public agency, a State officer or State employee in the officer's or employee's official capacity, regarding actions or omissions of the public agency, State officer or State employee. (3) If the Attorney General determines that a State officer or State employee is not entitled to indemnification, 20260HB2259PN2956 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Attorney General may, as it relates to the officer or employee, take action authorized under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2259PN2956 - 7 - 123